Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2999.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.97, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Grants management training. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop an online, on-demand grants management training program for state agency staff. At a minimum, the training must: new text end new text begin (1) include curriculum necessary for grants management managers and supervisors to properly and effectively manage a grants management program and for employees to effectively perform job duties; new text end new text begin (2) include instruction on the state's grants management policies; new text end new text begin (3) include instruction on fraud indicators; and new text end new text begin (4) require an exam that demonstrates an understanding of the skills, knowledge, and responsibilities presented in the training. new text end new text begin (b) All state agency staff assigned grant management responsibilities must complete initial grants management training before assuming grants management job duties and must complete continuing grants management training on an annual basis. new text end